District of Columbia statutes.
50-902

Purpose.

The DMV is charged with helping to improve the District of Columbia’s economic competitiveness and quality of life by fostering the safe operation of motor vehicles on District streets in accordance with applicable laws and regulations.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1823, 45 DCR 7193
1981 Ed., § 40-152.
For temporary addition of chapter, see note to § 50-901.
For temporary (90-day) addition of Chapter 1A, see notes following § 50-901.
Application of D.C. Law 12-175: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 50-901.